Utah statutes.
10-1-105.   No changes intended.
Unless otherwise specifically provided in this act, the provisions of this act
may not operate in any way to affect the property or contract rights or other
actions which may exist in favor of or against any municipality.  Nor shall
this act operate in any way to change or affect any ordinance, order or
resolution in force in any municipality and such ordinances, orders and
resolutions which are not repugnant to law, shall continue in full force and
effect until repealed or amended.
